src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#njeallje       K                ;
             njeallje+Num+Ess:#logi#njeallji%>n        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#njeallje           K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#njealji            K                ;
       njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#njealje            NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#njealji%>s         K                ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#njealji%>n         K                ; ! !SOUTH
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#njealljá%>j        K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#njealji            K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#njealji            K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#njealji%>t         K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#njelji%>jde        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#njelji%>jguin      K                ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#njeallje           K                ;
             njeallje+Num+Ess:e#logi#njeallji%>n        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#njeallje           K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#njealji            K                ;
       njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#njealje            NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#njealji%>s         K                ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#njealji%>n         K                ; ! !SOUTH
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#njealljá%>j        K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#njealji            K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#njealji            K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#njealji%>t         K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#njelji%>jde        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#njelji%>guin       K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#njeallje       K                ;
             njeallje+Num+Ess:htta#logi#njeallji%>n    K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#njeallje       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#njealji        K                ;
       njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#njealje        NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#njealji%>s     K                ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#njealji%>n     K                ; ! !SOUTH
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#njealljá%>j    K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#njealji        K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#njealji        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#njealji%>t     K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd   K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd   K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd   K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd   K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#njelji%>jde    K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#njelji%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#vihtta           K                ;
             vihtta+Num+Ess:#logi#vihtta%>n        K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#vihtta           K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#viđa             K                ;
       vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#viđa             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#viđa%>s          K                ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#viđa%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#vihtti%>j        K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa             K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#viđa             K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#viđa%>t          K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#viđa%>jde        K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#viđa%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#vihtta       K                ;
             vihtta+Num+Ess:#logi#vihttan          K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#vihtta           K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#viđa             K                ;
       vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#viđa             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#viđa%>s          K                ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#viđa%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#vihtti%>j        K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa             K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#viđa             K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#viđa%>t          K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#viđa%>jde        K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#viđa%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA   ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA   ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA   ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA   ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA   ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA   ;
